Mississippi, session 2026, SB2917.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 4, Chapter 549, Laws of 2023, as amended by Section 2, Chapter 510, Laws of 2024, is amended as follows: Section 4.  (1)  Monies transferred pursuant to Section 1 of this act into the 2022 IHL Capital Improvements Fund created in Section 37-101-83, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration, pursuant to the authority granted by the department's appropriation bill, Senate Bill No. 3043, 2023 Regular Session, to spend those monies, with the approval of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning on those projects related to the universities under its management and control to pay the costs of capital improvements, renovation and/or repair of existing facilities, furnishings and/or equipping facilities for public facilities as hereinafter described: AMOUNT NAME              PROJECT                             ALLOCATED Alcorn State University......................... $ 13,197,500.00 Repair, renovation, and expansion of and upgrades, improvements and additions to the David L. Whitney Complex and Wellness Center........................$ 13,197,500.00 Alcorn State University/Division of Agriculture...................................... $    620,000.00 Preplanning for renovation of the poultry science facilities on the Lorman Campus into a Poultry/Animal Science Center Academic Research Center Building Complex.......................$ 620,000.00 Delta State University........................... $ 8,122,500.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities................$  2,800,000.00 Repair and renovation of and upgrades, improvements and additions to the Walter Sillers Coliseum.......$ 5,322,500.00 Jackson State University......................... $ 8,013,000.00 Construction, furnishing and equipping of a new residence hall and related facilities, and/or repairing and renovating existing residence halls and related facilities........$ 8,013,000.00 Mississippi State University..................... $ 20,732,500.00 Repair, renovation, construction, acquisition of property, furnishing and equipping of related facilities to house the College of Architecture, Art and Design................$ 5,732,500.00 Repair, renovation, construction, acquisition of property, furnishing and equipping of related facilities of the Kinesiology and Autism Building...........$ 15,000,000.00 Mississippi State University/Division of Agriculture, Forestry and Veterinary Medicine.... $ 14,755,000.00 Repair and renovation of and upgrades and improvements to Dorman Hall and related facilities............$ 1,300,000.00 Preplanning for renovation of and upgrades and improvements to the Bost Extension Center........................$ 455,000.00 Repair and renovation of and upgrades and improvements to Dorman Hall and related facilities............$ 13,000,000.00 Mississippi University for Women................. $ 9,312,500.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities................$  8,712,500.00 Preplanning for repair and renovation of and upgrades and improvements to Old Pohl Gym......................$ 300,000.00 Preplanning for repair and renovation of and upgrades and improvements to the Hogarth Center................$ 300,000.00 Mississippi Valley State University............... $  3,427,500.00 Demolition of Leflore Hall and * * * preplanning for construction, furnishing and equipping of a new residence hall repair and renovation of existing residence halls and related facilities....................$ 3,427,500.00 University of Mississippi........................ $ 18,382,500.00 Planning and construction, furnishing and equipping of a new building and related facilities to house the School of Accountancy................$ 14,382,500.00 Repair, renovation, and expansion of the Nursing School in Oxford........................$ 4,000,000.00 University of Mississippi Medical Center.......... $ 56,886,500.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities................$ 11,350,000.00 Upgrades and improvements to elevators and related facilities....................$ 4,000,000.00 Development and implementation of campus wayfinding system........................$ 1,536,500.00 Construction, furnishing and equipping of a new Dental School...................................... $ 40,000,000.00 University of Southern Mississippi................ $ 22,162,500.00 Construction, furnishing and equipping of a new science research facility.....$ 17,162,500.00 Repair and renovation of the Criminal Justice Building and improvements to the Forensic Lab .................$ 5,000,000.00 University of Southern Mississippi/Gulf Coast Campuses................................... $ 11,140,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities at the Gulf Coast Research Laboratory, Halstead Campus...............$ 640,000.00 Ocean Enterprise at the Port of Gulfport..........$ 10,000,000.00 Dubard School and Children's Center for Communication and Development  Gulf Park campus for furnishing and equipment..$    500,000.00 IHL Education and Research Center................ $ 6,500,000.00 Replacement of a chiller and related equipment for the campus air conditioning and heating system; replacement of cooling tower and related equipment for the campus air conditioning and heating system; replacement of roof for the Universities Center; and replacement of campus emergency management system........................$ 6,500,000.00 TOTAL........................................... $193,252,000.00 (2)  (a)  Amounts transferred into such special fund pursuant to Section 1 of this act shall be disbursed to pay the costs of projects described in subsection (1) of this section.  If any monies in such special fund are not used within four (4) years after the date funds are transferred under Section 1 of this act into the special fund, then the institution of higher learning for which any unused monies are allocated under subsection (1) of this section shall provide an accounting of such unused monies to the Department of Finance and Administration. (b)  Monies in the special fund may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, in administering or providing assistance directly related to a project described in subsection (1) of this section.  An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained for each project by the Department of Finance and Administration, Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management.  Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs for a project shall not exceed two percent (2%) of the monies in the special fund used for such project.  Monies authorized for a particular project may not be used to reimburse administrative costs for unrelated projects. (3)  The Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, is expressly authorized and empowered to receive and expend any local or other source funds in connection with the expenditure of funds provided for in this section.  The expenditure of monies deposited into the special fund shall be under the direction of the Department of Finance and Administration, and such funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by such department, which warrants shall be issued upon requisitions signed by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, or his or her designee. (4)  Any amounts allocated to an institution of higher learning that are in excess of that needed to complete the projects at such institution of higher learning that are described in subsection (1) of this section may be used for general repairs and renovations at the institution of higher learning. SECTION 2.  Section 5, Chapter 534, Laws of 2024, as amended by Section 1, Chapter 510, Laws of 2025, is amended as follows: Section 5.  (1)  Monies transferred pursuant to Section 1 of this act into the 2022 IHL Capital Improvements Fund created in Section 37-101-83, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration, pursuant to the authority to spend those monies granted by an appropriation bill passed separately during the 2024 Regular Session, with the approval of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning on those projects related to the universities under its management and control to pay the costs of capital improvements, renovation and/or repair of existing facilities, furnishings and/or equipping facilities for public facilities as hereinafter described: AMOUNT AMOUNT ENTITY ALLOCATED       ALLOCATED PROJECT PER PROJECT     PER ENTITY Alcorn State University......................... $ 8,311,736.00 Repair, renovation, and expansion of and upgrades and improvements to the David L. Whitney Complex and Wellness Center..........$   8,311,736.00 Delta State University.......................... $ 4,020,808.00 Repair and replacement of roofs for various campus academic and administrative buildings.....$   4,020,808.00 Jackson State University........................ $ 23,020,794.00 Repair and renovation of and upgrades and improvements to campus buildings and facilities, including, but not limited to, McAllister-Whiteside Hall and development of alternative water resources and infrastructure for critical campus facilities...................$ 16,020,794.00 Construction, repair, renovation, furnishing and equipping and/or purchase of new residence halls..............$ 7,000,000.00 Mississippi State University.................... $ 13,284,608.00 Repair, renovation, construction, acquisition of property, furnishing and equipping of buildings and related facilities to house the College of Architecture, Art and Design...................$  13,284,608.00 Mississippi State University/Division of Agriculture, Forestry and Veterinary Medicine... $  10,231,362.00 Repair and renovation of and upgrades and improvements to Bost Extension Center and Dorman Hall..............$ 10,231,362.00 Mississippi Valley State University.............. $   8,856,405.00 * * *Construction, furnishing and equipping of a new residence hall Repair and renovation of existing residence halls and related      facilities...................$   8,856,405.00 University of Mississippi....................... $ 16,561,477.00 Construction, furnishing and equipping of a new mechanical and power plant building and related facilities to serve the northwest quadrant of the campus and repair, renovation, furnishing, equipping and expansion of and additions to the Data Center Building and related facilities...........$ 16,561,477.00 University of Mississippi Medical Center......... $   7,085,124.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings, facilities, and infrastructure...............$ 7,085,124.00 University of Southern Mississippi............... $  18,627,686.00 Construction, furnishing and equipping of the Science Research Facility with a central mechanical plant and related infrastructure and facilities on the Hattiesburg Campus...........$ 18,627,686.00 TOTAL.......................................... $ 110,000,000.00 (2)  (a)  Amounts transferred into such special fund pursuant to Section 1 of this act shall be disbursed to pay the costs of projects described in subsection (1) of this section.  If any monies in such special fund are not used within four (4) years after the date funds are transferred under Section 1 of this act into the special fund, then the institution of higher learning for which any unused monies are allocated under subsection (1) of this section shall provide an accounting of such unused monies to the Department of Finance and Administration. (b)  Monies in the special fund may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, in administering or providing assistance directly related to a project described in subsection (1) of this section.  An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained for each project by the Department of Finance and Administration, Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management.  Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs for a project shall not exceed two percent (2%) of the monies in the special fund used for such project.  Monies authorized for a particular project may not be used to reimburse administrative costs for unrelated projects. (3)  The Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, is expressly authorized and empowered to receive and expend any local or other source funds in connection with the expenditure of funds provided for in this section.  The expenditure of monies deposited into the special fund shall be under the direction of the Department of Finance and Administration.  The funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon issued warrants by the Department of Finance and Administration.  The warrants shall be issued upon requisitions signed by the State Fiscal Officer, or his or her designee. (4)  Any amounts allocated to an institution of higher learning that are in excess of that needed to complete the projects at such institution of higher learning that are described in subsection (1) of this section may be used for general repairs and renovations at the institution of higher learning. SECTION 3.  During fiscal year 2027, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer to the General Fund out of the following enumerated funds, the amounts listed below from each fund: FUND                          FUND NUMBER                   AMOUNT Capital Expense Fund          6499C00000 $1.00 Budget Contingency Fund       6117700000 $1.00 TOTAL..................................................... $2.00 SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and shall stand repealed on the day before its passage.